Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-761 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A physician, medical student, resident, Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse, registered nurse, or physician assistant shall not


perform a pelvic examination on an anesthetized or unconscious


female patient unless:


1. That patient gave informed written consent to the pelvic


examination;


2. The performance of the pelvic examination is within the


scope of care for a surgical procedure or diagnostic examination; or





Req. No. 11094 Page 1


3. In the case of a patient incapable of giving informed


consent, the pelvic examination is required for diagnosis or


treatment of such patient.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-11094 TJ 12/13/24





































Req. No. 11094 Page 2